Louisiana, session 2026, HB479.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 44 of Title 13 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 13:6001, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 44. FISCAL TRUTH IN SENTENCING ACT
§6001. Fiscal Truth in Sentencing Act; creation, authority, and duties
A. The Fiscal Truth in Sentencing Act is established in this Chapter to assist
the legislative budgeting process and provide public transparency of financing the
criminal justice system.
B. For the purposes of this Act, each district clerk of court has the following
duties and obligations:
(1) Each district clerk of court responsible for maintaining criminal records
shall provide the legislative auditor with no less than quarterly reports with
sentencing data, as defined in Subsection C of this Section, for the purpose of state
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-640 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 479
budget projections, as of the effective date of this Chapter. The provisions of this
Paragraph do not apply to traffic violations.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, including
but not limited to Children's Code Article 412, each district clerk of court and the
clerk of the Juvenile Court for the parish of Orleans as defined in R.S. 13:1587.1,
who is responsible for juvenile court records shall transmit to the legislative auditor,
no less than quarterly, reports with sentencing data as defined in Subsection C of this
Section of all cases involving juveniles sentenced to incarceration. No other records
or images, other than sentencing data as defined in Section C, are required to be
transmitted in accordance with this Section.
(b) The provisions of this Paragraph are applicable only to sentences issued
on or after August 1, 2026.
C. For the purposes of this Chapter, the term "sentencing data" includes but
is not limited to the following:
(1) The number of individuals sentenced to confinement per judge presiding.
(2) The total number of years of confinement per judge presiding.
(3) For each person sentenced to twenty years or more, their age at the time
of sentencing.
D. The Division of Administration shall report to the legislative auditor by
October fifteenth of each year the final budget figures for the prior fiscal year for the
following budget units:
(1) Department of Public Safety and Corrections - Corrections Services.
(2) Department of Public Safety and Corrections - office of juvenile justice.
(3) Department of Public Safety and Corrections - Municipal Police
Supplemental Payments and Deputy Sheriffs' Supplemental Payments.
(4) Office of the state public defender.
(5) The Judiciary.
(6) District Attorneys and Assistant District Attorneys.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-640 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 479
E. The legislative auditor shall provide an annual report to the House
Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance no later than
December fifteenth of each year. The report shall project the five-year incarceration
costs using the aggregated sentencing data provided pursuant to Subsection B of this
Section, along with any other relevant data including but not limited to the following:
(1) Budget data collected pursuant to Subsection D of this Section.
(2) Appropriations in the most recently enacted comprehensive capital
budget for construction and improvements of prisons and jails.
(3) Appropriations in the most recently enacted state budget for state debt
service related to prisons and jails.
(4) Civil judgments and damages awarded in cases related to prisons and
jails.
(5) The Corrections Primary and Secondary Plan within the Louisiana State
Employees' Retirement System.
(6) Using the aggregated data, an estimated average cost to incarcerate a
person in this state per reporting year.
E. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the clerks of court
and their employees and agents; the legislative auditor, including its employees and
agents; and any other state or local entity or political subdivision that is responsible
for providing information to the clerks of court shall be immune from liability arising
from any acts or omissions related to compliance with the provisions of this Section.
The provisions of this Section shall not be construed to limit, withdraw, or overturn
any other applicable defense or immunity available to public officials or public
entities.
F. Reporting by clerks shall commence with the last quarter of 2026, and at
the conclusion of every quarter thereafter.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-640 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 479